Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.010

Who may grant restraining orders and injunctions.

Restraining orders and injunctions may be granted by the superior court, or by any judge thereof.

[ 1957 c 9 s 11; Code 1881 s 153; 1877 p 32 s 153; 1869 p 38 s 151; 1854 p 152 s 111; RRS s 718.]